Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1346
Uniformity of interpretation.

In applying and construing the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 10.